Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 3. Mississippi Department of Employment Security.

§ 71-5-101.
Organization [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is established the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor. The Department of Employment Security shall be the Mississippi Employment Security Commission and shall retain all powers and duties as granted to the Mississippi Employment Security Commission. Wherever the term “Employment Security Commission” appears in any law, the same shall mean the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor. The Executive Director of the Department of Employment Security may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7399, 7400; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, §§ 5a, 5b; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 11, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§§ 71-5-103 and 71-5-105.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 59 effective from and after July 1, 2004.

§71-5-103.Codes, 1942, § 7401; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 5c, eff July 1, 1948.

§71-5-105.Codes, 1942, § 7402; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 5d; Laws, 1975, ch. 514, eff from and after July 1, 1975.

§ 71-5-107.
Executive officer [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The department shall administer this chapter through a full-time salaried executive director, to be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. He shall be responsible for the administration of this chapter under authority delegated to him by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7403; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 5e; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 12, reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 12, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-109.
Board of review [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is created a Board of Review consisting of three (3) members to be appointed by the executive director. The executive director shall designate one (1) member of the Board of Review as chairman. Each member shall be paid a salary or per diem at a rate to be determined by the executive director, and such expenses as may be allowed by the executive director. All salaries, per diem and expenses of the Board of Review shall be paid from the Employment Security Administration Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7404; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 288, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 5f; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 13, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-111.
Employment security administration fund [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Employment Security Administration Fund. All monies which are deposited or paid into this fund are appropriated and made available to the department. All monies in this fund shall be expended solely for the purpose of defraying the cost of administration of this chapter, and for no other purpose whatsoever. The fund shall consist of all monies appropriated by this state and all monies received from the United States of America, or any agency thereof, or from any other source for such purpose. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, all monies requisitioned and deposited in this fund pursuant to Section 71-5-457 shall remain part of the Employment Security Administration Fund and shall be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in that section. All monies in this fund shall be deposited, administered and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as is provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury. The State Treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the Employment Security Administration Fund under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7421; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 11; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 8a; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 2(a); Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 14, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-112.
Funds to clear through state treasury; laws governing expenditures [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

All funds received by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security shall clear through the State Treasury as provided and required by Sections 71-5-111 and 71-5-453. All expenditures from the administration fund of the department authorized by Section 71-5-111 shall be expended only pursuant to appropriation approved by the Legislature and as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 381, § 3; Laws, 1974, ch. 334; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 273; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 15; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 15, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-113.
Funds received from the Social Security Board [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

All monies received from the Social Security Board or its successors for the administration of this chapter shall be expended solely for the purposes and in the amounts found necessary by the Social Security Board or its successors for the proper and efficient administration of this chapter.

It shall be the duty of the department to take appropriate action with respect to the replacement, within a reasonable time, of any monies received from the Social Security Board, or its successors, for the administration of this chapter, and monies used to match grants pursuant to the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, which the board, or its successors, find, because of any action or contingency, have been lost or have been expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of those found necessary by the Social Security Board, or its successors, for the proper administration of this chapter. Funds which have been expended by the department or its agents in accordance with the budget approved by the Social Security Board, or its successors, or in accordance with the general standards and limitations promulgated by the Social Security Board, or its successors, prior to such expenditure (where proposed expenditures have not been specifically disapproved by the Social Security Board, or its successors), shall not be deemed to require replacement. To effectuate the purposes of this paragraph, it shall be the duty of the department to take such action to safeguard the expenditure of the funds referred to herein as it deems necessary. In the event of a loss of such funds or an improper expenditure thereof as herein defined, it shall be the duty of the department to notify the Governor of any such loss or improper expenditure and submit to him a request for an appropriation in the amount thereof. The Governor shall transmit to the next regular session of the Legislature following such notification, the department’s request for an appropriation in an amount necessary to replace funds which have been lost or improperly expended as defined above. Such request of the department for an appropriation shall not be subject to the provisions of Sections 27-103-101 through 27-103-139. The Legislature recognizes its obligation to replace such funds as may be necessary and shall make necessary appropriations in accordance with such requests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7422; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 11; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 8b, c; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 2b, c; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 16, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-114.
Special employment security administration fund [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund, to be known as the “Special Employment Security Administration Fund,” into which shall be deposited or transferred all interest, penalties and damages collected on and after July 1, 1982, pursuant to Sections 71-5-363 through 71-5-379 and all interest and penalties required to be deposited into the fund pursuant to Section 71-5-19(4)(b). Interest, penalties and damages collected on delinquent payments deposited during any calendar quarter in the clearing account in the Unemployment Trust Fund shall, as soon as practicable after the close of such calendar quarter, be transferred to the Special Employment Security Administration Fund. All monies in this fund shall be deposited, administered and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as is provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury. The State Treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the Special Employment Security Administration Fund under this chapter. Those monies may be expended for any programs for which the department has administrative responsibility but shall not be expended or made available for expenditure in any manner which would permit their substitution for (or permit a corresponding reduction in) federal funds which would, in the absence of those monies, be available to finance expenditures for the administration of the state unemployment compensation and employment service laws or any other laws directing the administration of any programs for which the department has the administrative responsibility. Nothing in this section shall prevent those monies in this fund from being used as a revolving fund to cover expenditures necessary and proper under the law for which federal funds have been duly requested but not yet received, subject to the charging of such expenditures against such funds when necessary. The monies in this fund may be used by the department for the payment of costs of administration of the employment security laws of this state which are found not to be or not to have been properly and validly chargeable against funds obtained from federal sources. All monies in this Special Employment Security Administration Fund shall be continuously available to the department for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and shall not lapse at any time. The monies in this fund are specifically made available to replace, as contemplated by Section 71-5-113, expenditures from the Employment Security Administration Fund established by Section 71-5-111, which have been found, because of any action or contingency, to have been lost or improperly expended.

The department, whenever it is of the opinion that the money in the Special Employment Security Administration Fund is more than ample to pay for all foreseeable needs for which such special fund is set up, may, by written order, order the transfer therefrom to the Unemployment Compensation Fund of such amount of money in the Special Employment Security Administration Fund as it deems proper, and the same shall thereupon be immediately transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 17; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 17, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-115.
Duties and powers of executive director [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

It shall be the duty of the executive director to administer this chapter; and the executive director shall have the power and authority to adopt, amend or rescind such rules and regulations, to employ such persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action as he deems necessary or suitable to that end. Such rules and regulations shall be effective upon publication in the manner, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, which the executive director shall prescribe. The executive director shall determine the department’s own organization and methods of procedure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed. Not later than the first day of February in each year, the executive director shall submit to the Governor a report covering the administration and operation of this chapter during the preceding fiscal year and shall make such recommendations for amendments to this chapter as the executive director deems proper. Whenever the executive director believes that a change in contribution or benefit rates will become necessary to protect the solvency of the fund, he shall promptly so inform the Governor and the Legislature, and make recommendations with respect thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7405; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6a; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4a; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6a; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3a; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 18, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-116.
Annual report tracking data from contractors to be used to improve workforce training programs.

The Mississippi Department of Employment Security will develop an annual report which tracks data received from contractors. Contractors will cooperate with the Mississippi Department of Employment Security to accumulate relevant data.Collected data and reports are intended solely to allow the Mississippi Department of Employment Security to improve workforce training programs, tailoring trainings to employer needs and hiring trends for in-demand jobs in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 2012).

§ 71-5-117.
Regulations and general rules [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

General rules may be adopted, amended or rescinded by the executive director only after public hearing or opportunity to be heard thereon, of which proper notice has been given. General rules shall become effective ten (10) days after filing with the Secretary of State and publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation in this state. Regulations may be adopted, amended or rescinded by the executive director and shall become effective in the manner and at the time prescribed by the executive director.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7406; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6b; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4b; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6b; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3b; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 19, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-119.
Publication [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The department shall cause to be available for distribution to the public the text of this chapter, its regulations and general rules, its reports to the Governor, and any other material it deems relevant and suitable, and shall furnish the same to any person upon application therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7407; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6c; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4c; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6c; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3c; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 20; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 20, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-121.
Personnel [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Subject to other provisions of this chapter, the executive director is authorized to appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the duties and powers of such officers, accountants, attorneys, experts and other persons as may be necessary in the performance of department duties; however, all personnel who were former members of the Armed Forces of the United States of America shall be given credit regardless of rate, rank or commission. All positions shall be filled by persons selected and appointed on a nonpartisan merit basis, in accordance with Section 25-9-101 et seq., that provides for a state service personnel system. The executive director shall not employ any person who is an officer or committee member of any political party organization. The executive director may delegate to any such person so appointed such power and authority as he deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter, and may in his discretion bond any person handling monies or signing checks hereunder. The veteran status of an individual shall be considered and preference given in accordance with the provisions of the State Personnel Board.

The department and its employees are exempt from Sections 25-15-101 and 25-15-103.

The department may use federal granted funds to provide such group health, life, accident and hospitalization insurance for its employees as may be agreed upon by the department and the federal granting authorities.

The department shall adopt a “layoff formula” to be used wherever it is determined that, because of reduced workload, budget reductions or in order to effect a more economical operation, a reduction in force shall occur in any group.

In establishing this formula, the department shall give effect to the principle of seniority and shall provide that seniority points may be added for disabled veterans and veterans, with due regard to the efficiency of the service. Any such layoff formula shall be implemented according to the policies, rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7408; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6d; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4d; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6d; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3d; Laws, 1964, ch. 442, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 507, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 21, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-123.
Advisory councils [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The executive director shall retain all powers and duties as granted to the state advisory council appointed by the former Employment Security Commission. The executive director may appoint local advisory councils, composed in each case of an equal number of employer representatives and employee representatives who may fairly be regarded as representative because of their vocation, employment or affiliations, and of such members representing the general public as the executive director may designate. Such councils shall aid the department in formulating policies and discussing problems related to the administration of this chapter and in assuring impartiality and freedom from political influence in the solution of such problems. Members of the advisory councils shall receive a per diem in accordance with Section 25-3-69 for attendance upon meetings of the council, and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary traveling expenses. The per diem and expenses herein authorized shall be paid from the Employment Security Administration Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7409; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6e; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4e; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6e; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3e; Laws, 1989, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 22, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-125.
Promotion of employment [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The department shall take all appropriate steps to reduce and prevent unemployment; to encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining and vocational guidance; to investigate, recommend, advise and assist in the establishment and operation, by municipalities, counties, school districts and the state, of reserves for public works to be used in times of business depression and unemployment; to promote the reemployment of unemployed workers throughout the state in every other way that may be feasible; and to these ends to carry on and publish the results of investigation and research studies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7410; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6f; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4f; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6f; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3f; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 23, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-127.
Records and reports; confidentiality of information [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Any information or records concerning an individual or employing unit obtained by the department pursuant to the administration of this chapter or any other federally funded programs for which the department has responsibility shall be private and confidential, except as otherwise provided in this article or by regulation. Information or records may be released by the department when the release is required by the federal government in connection with, or as a condition of funding for, a program being administered by the department.

Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work records, containing such information as the department may prescribe. Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied by the department or its authorized representatives at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The department, Board of Review and any referee may require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports with respect to persons employed by it which they or any of them deem necessary for the effective administration of this chapter. Information, statements, transcriptions of proceedings, transcriptions of recordings, electronic recordings, letters, memoranda, and other documents and reports thus obtained or obtained from any individual pursuant to the administration of this chapter shall, except to the extent necessary for the proper administration of this chapter, be held confidential and shall not be published or be opened to public inspection (other than to public employees in the performance of their public duties) in any manner revealing the individual’s or employing unit’s identity.

Any claimant or his legal representative at a hearing before an appeal tribunal or the Board of Review shall be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his claim in any proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

Any employee or member of the Board of Review or any employee of the department who violates any provisions of this section shall be fined not less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) nor more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or imprisoned for not longer than ninety (90) days, or both.

The department may make the state’s records relating to the administration of this chapter available to the Railroad Retirement Board, and may furnish the Railroad Retirement Board, at the expense of such board, such copies thereof as the Railroad Retirement Board deems necessary for its purposes. The department may afford reasonable cooperation with every agency of the United States charged with the administration of any unemployment insurance law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7411; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6g(1); Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4g(1); Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6g(1); Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3g(1); Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 24; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 24, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-129.
Destruction of useless records [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Records hereinafter designated, which are found by the department to be useless, may be disposed of in accordance with approved records control schedules.

Records which have been preserved by it for not less than three (3) years:

Initial claims for benefits,

Continued claims for benefits,

Correspondence and master index cards in connection with such claims for benefits, and

Individual wage slips filed by employers subject to the provisions of the Unemployment Compensation Law.

Work orders,

Clearance records,

Counseling records,

Farm placement records, and

Correspondence relating to all such records.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed as authorizing the destruction or disposal of basic fiscal records reflecting the financial operations of the department and no records may be destroyed without the approval of the Director of the Department of Archives and History.

Records which have been preserved by it for not less than six (6) months after becoming inactive:

Work applications,

Cross-index cards for work applications,

Test records,

Employer records,

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7411-01, 7411-02, 7411-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 290, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 418; Laws, 1952, ch. 390; Laws, 1970, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 501, § 25; Laws, 1987, ch. 318; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 25, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-131.
Privileged communications [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

All letters, reports, communications, or any other matters, either oral or written, from the employer or employee to each other or to the department or any of its agents, representatives or employees, which shall have been written, sent, delivered or made in connection with the requirements and administration of this chapter shall be absolutely privileged and shall not be made the subject matter or basis of any suit for slander or libel in any court of the State of Mississippi unless the same be false in fact and maliciously written, sent, delivered or made for the purpose of causing a denial of benefits under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7412; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6g(2); Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4g(2); Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6g(2); Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3g(2); Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 250; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 26, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-133.
Failure to produce records [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

In any case where an employing unit or any officer, member or agent thereof, or any other person having possession of the records thereof, shall fail or refuse upon demand by the department or its duly appointed agents to produce or permit the examination or copying of any book, paper, account, record or other data pertaining to payrolls or employment or ownership of interests or stock in any employing unit, or bearing upon the correctness of any report, or for the purpose of making a report as required by this chapter where none has been made, then and in that event the department or its duly authorized agents may, by the issuance of a subpoena, require the attendance of such employing unit or any officer, member or agent thereof, or any other person having possession of the records thereof, and take testimony with respect to any such matter and may require any such person to produce any books or records specified in such subpoena. The department or its authorized agents at any such hearing shall have power to administer oaths to any such person or persons. When any person called as a witness by a subpoena signed by the department or its agents and served upon him by the sheriff of a county of which such person is a resident, or wherein is located the principal office of such employing unit or wherein such records are located or kept, shall fail to obey such subpoena to appear before the department or its authorized agent, or shall refuse to testify or to answer any questions or to produce any book, record, paper or other data when required to do so, such failure or refusal shall be reported to the Attorney General, who shall thereupon institute proceedings by the filing of a petition in the name of the State of Mississippi, on the relation of the department, in the circuit court or other court of competent jurisdiction of the county where such witness resides, or wherein such records are located or kept, to compel the obedience of such witness. Such petition shall set forth the facts and circumstances of the demand for and refusal or failure to permit the examination or copying of such records, or the failure or refusal of such witness to testify in answer to such subpoena or to produce the records so required by such subpoena. Such court, upon the filing and docketing of such petition, shall thereupon promptly issue an order to the defendants named in the petition to produce forthwith in such court, or at a place in such county designated in such order for the examination or copying by the department or its duly appointed agents, the records, books or documents so described, and to testify concerning matters described in such petition. Unless such defendants to such petition shall appear in the court upon a day specified in such order, which day shall be not more than ten (10) days after the date of issuance of such order, and offer, under oath, good and sufficient reasons why such examination or copying should not be permitted, or why such subpoena should not be obeyed, such court shall thereupon deliver to the department or its agents, for examination or copying, the records, books and documents so described in the petition and so produced in such court, and shall order the defendants to appear in answer to the subpoena of the department or its agents, and to testify concerning matters inquired about by the department. Any employing unit or any officer, member or agent thereof, or any other person having possession of the records thereof, who shall willfully disobey such order of the court after the same shall have been served upon him shall be guilty of indirect contempt of such court from which such order shall have issued, and may be adjudged in contempt of the court and punished therefor as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7413; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6h; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4h; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6h; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3h; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 27, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-135.
Failure to make reports [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

If any employing unit fails to make any report required by this chapter, the department or its authorized agents shall give notice to such employing unit to make and file such report within fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice. If such employing unit, by its proper members, officers or agents, shall fail or refuse to make and file such reports within such time, then and in that event such report shall be made by the department or its authorized agents from the best information available, and the amount of contributions due shall be computed thereon; and such report shall be prima facie correct for the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7414; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6i; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4i; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6i; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3i; Laws, 1992, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 28; Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 28, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-137.
Oaths and witnesses [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter, the department, any referee, the members of the Board of Review, and any duly authorized representative of any of them shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, to take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records deemed necessary as evidence in connection with a disputed claim or the administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7415; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6j; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4j; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6j; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3j; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 29, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 29, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-139.
Subpoenas [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any court in this state within the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on, or within the jurisdiction of which the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, upon application by the department, the Board of Review, any referee, or any duly authorized representative of any of them, shall have jurisdiction to issue to such person an order requiring such person to appear before the department, the Board of Review, any referee, or any duly authorized representative of any of them, there to produce evidence if so ordered or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. Any person who shall, without just cause, fail or refuse to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records if it is in his power so to do, in obedience to a subpoena of the department, the Board of Review, any referee, or any duly authorized representative of any of them, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or by imprisonment for not longer than sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and each day such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7416; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6k; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4k; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6k; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3k; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 30.

§ 71-5-141.
Protection against self-incrimination [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records before the department, the Board of Review, any referee, or any duly authorized representative of any of them, or in obedience to the subpoena of any of them in any cause or proceeding before the department, the Board of Review or an appeal tribunal, on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture; but no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that such individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7417; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 6l; Laws, 1952, ch. 383, § 4l; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 6l; Laws, 1962, ch. 564, § 3l; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 31, eff from and after April 3, 2019.